Hawaii statutes.
§392-26 Care by physician or equivalent
required. (a) An individual shall be ineligible to receive temporary
disability benefits with respect to any period during which the individual is
not under the care of a person duly licensed to practice medicine, surgery,
dentistry, chiropractic, osteopathy, or naturopathic medicine, who shall
certify, in the form and manner specified by regulation of the director, the
disability of the claimant, the probable duration thereof, and such other
medical facts within the person's knowledge as required by regulation.

(b) This section shall not apply to an
individual who, pursuant to the teachings, faith, or belief of any group,
depends for healing upon prayer or other spiritual means. In that case the
disability, the probable duration thereof, and any other pertinent facts
required to be certified by regulation of the director shall be certified, in
the form and manner specified by the regulation, by a duly authorized or
accredited practitioner of such group.

(c) The proof of disability duly certified by
a person licensed to practice medicine, surgery, dentistry, chiropractic,
osteopathy, or naturopathic medicine, or an authorized or accredited
practitioner of any group which depends for healing upon prayer or other spiritual
means shall be submitted by such certifying person to the disabled employee
within seven working days after the date on which the employee was examined and
found disabled. If the certifying person fails to submit the required proof
within seven working days, the director, upon notification by the insurer, may
levy a penalty of $25 for each delinquent certification where the certifying
person fails to show good cause for the person's failure to file on time. [L
1969, c 148, pt of §1; am L 1971, c 109, §1(b); am L 1973, c 172, §1; am L
1974, c 154, §1; am L 1979, c 105, §41; gen ch 1985; L Sp 2009, c 22, §11(2)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next